Georgia, session 2025_26, HB412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Polk County Water Authority, approved April 14, 1967 (Ga. L. 1967,
p. 3108), as amended, is amended by revising subsection (e) of Section 2 as follows:
"(e) No member shall be eligible for reappointment for a period of two years from the
expiration of his or her second consecutive previous term. Notwithstanding any other
provisions herein, all members of the Authority shall serve until their successors are
appointed and qualified."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 412
- 1 -